Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2030
Retirement; disability; medical examinations; expense.

The board shall have the right to demand a physical examination of the member by a disinterested physician legally authorized to practice medicine under the laws of the state in which he or she practices, chosen by the system and at the expense of the system.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 13(4), p. 691;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-457;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 39.